Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3001
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3001 to 71-3006 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Mental Health First Aid Training Act.

Laws 2014, LB901, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 159.
July 1, 2026